Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.240

Registration statements—Generally.

A registration statement may be filed by the issuer, any other person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or a registered broker-dealer. The director may by rule or otherwise permit the omission of any item of information or document from any registration statement.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 12; 1959 c 282 s 24.]